District of Columbia statutes.
46-413

Failure to make return.

Any minister or other person, having solemnized or witnessed the rites of marriage under the authority of a license issued as aforesaid, who shall fail to make return as therein required, shall be liable to a penalty of $50 upon conviction of said failure upon information in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1393, ch. 854, § 1294
Apr. 23, 1904, 33 Stat. 298, ch. 1490, § 3
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
1981 Ed., § 30-113.
1973 Ed., § 30-113.